Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 6
LIMITATIONS ON CHARGES

5-10-601. Additional charges.

A lessor may contract for and receive an initial nonrefundable fee not to exceed ten dollars per contract. Should any security deposit be required by the lessor, the amount of such deposit and the conditions under which it will be returned shall be disclosed with the disclosures required by section 5-10-401.

A lessor may contract for and receive an initial delivery charge per contract not to exceed fifteen dollars in the case of a rental purchase agreement covering five or fewer items and a delivery charge not to exceed forty-five dollars in the case of a rental purchase agreement covering more than five items, if, in either case, the lessor actually delivers the items to the lessee's dwelling and the delivery charge is disclosed with the disclosures required by section 5-10-401. Said delivery charge shall be assessed in lieu of and not in addition to the initial charge in subsection (1) of this section. A lessor may not contract for or receive a delivery charge on property redelivered after repair or maintenance.

A lessor may contract for and receive a charge for picking up late payments from the lessee if the lessor is required to do so pursuant to the rental purchase agreement or is requested to visit the lessee to pick up a payment. In a rental purchase agreement with payment or renewal dates which are on a monthly basis, this charge may not be assessed more than three times in any six-month period. In rental purchase agreements with payments or renewal options on a weekly or biweekly basis, this charge may not be assessed more than six times in any six-month period. No charge assessed pursuant to this subsection (3) may exceed ten dollars. A pickup fee may be assessed pursuant to this subsection (3) only in lieu of and not in addition to any late charge assessed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

The parties may contract for late charges as follows:

For rental purchase agreements with monthly renewal dates, a late charge not exceeding five dollars may be assessed on any payment not made within five days after payment is due, or return of the property is required.

For rental purchase agreements with weekly or bi-weekly renewal dates, a late charge not exceeding three dollars may be assessed on any payments not made within three days after payment is due, or return of the property is required.

A late charge on a rental purchase agreement may be collected only once on any accrued payment, no matter how long it remains unpaid. A late charge may be collected at the time it accrues or at any time thereafter. A lessor may elect to waive imposition of a late charge due on an accrued payment in accordance with the terms of the rental purchase agreement; except that, such waiver shall be in writing and, once a late charge is waived for a specific payment, the lessor may not thereafter seek to impose a late fee for the accrued payment in question. No late charge may be assessed against a payment that is timely made, even though an earlier late charge has not been paid in full.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 371, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-602. Reinstatement fees.

A reinstatement fee as provided for in section 5-10-701 shall equal the outstanding balance of any accrued missed payments and late charges plus an additional fee not to exceed five dollars.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 372, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-603. Liability damage waivers - fees.

In addition to the other charges permitted by this part 6, the parties may contract for a liability waiver fee not to exceed the greater of ten percent of any periodic lease payment due or two dollars in the case of any rental purchase agreement with weekly or biweekly renewal dates, and not to exceed the greater of ten percent of any periodic lease payment due or five dollars in the case of any rental purchase agreement with monthly renewal dates. The selling or offering for sale of a liability damage waiver pursuant to this article is subject to the following prohibitions and requirements:

A lessor may not sell or offer to sell a liability damage waiver unless all restrictions, conditions, and exclusions are printed in the rental purchase agreement, or in a separate agreement, in eight-point type, or larger, or written in pen and ink or typewritten in or on the face of the rental purchase agreement in a blank space provided therefor. The liability damage waiver may exclude only loss or damage to the property which is the subject of the rental purchase agreement due to moisture, scratches, mysterious disappearance, vandalism, abandonment of the property, or due to any other damages caused intentionally by the lessee or which result from the lessee's willful or wanton misconduct.

The liability damage waiver agreement must include a statement of the total charge for the liability damage waiver. The liability damage waiver agreement must display in eight-point boldface type the following notice:

The restrictions, conditions, and exclusions of the liability damage waiver must be disclosed on a separate agreement, sheet, or handout given to the lessee prior to entering into the rental purchase agreement. The separate contract, sheet, or handout must be signed, or otherwise acknowledged by the lessee as being received prior to entering into the rental purchase agreement.

NOTICE: THIS CONTRACT OFFERS, FOR AN ADDITIONAL CHARGE, A LIABILITY DAMAGE WAIVER TO COVER YOUR RESPONSIBILITY FOR DAMAGE TO THE PROPERTY. BEFORE DECIDING WHETHER TO PURCHASE THE LIABILITY DAMAGE WAIVER, YOU MAY WISH TO DETERMINE WHETHER YOUR OWN HOMEOWNERS OR CASUALTY INSURANCE AFFORDS YOU COVERAGE FOR DAMAGE TO THE RENTAL PROPERTY, AND THE AMOUNT OF THE DEDUCTIBLE UNDER YOUR OWN INSURANCE COVERAGE. THE PURCHASE OF THIS LIABILITY DAMAGE WAIVER IS NOT MANDATORY AND MAY BE DECLINED.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 372, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-604. Taxes.

In addition to those charges allowable by this part 6, the lessor may require the lessee to pay all applicable state sales and use taxes levied in connection with the rental purchase agreement.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 373, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.